North Carolina, session 2025, SB603.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Appropriation. – The sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to provide a grant to the Town
of Davidson (Town) for the following purposes:
(1) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for the construction of portions of the
Carolina Thread Trail connecting the Town to trail segments in Iredell and
Cabarrus Counties.
(2) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for construction of segments of the
West Branch Nature Preserve Greenway in and connecting to the Town.
SECTION 2. G.S. 143C-5-2 does not apply to the appropriations in this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S603-v-1*